District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.04

International application of chapter.

(a)

A court of the District shall treat a foreign country as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying subchapters I and II of this chapter.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a child-custody determination made in a foreign country under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must be recognized and enforced under subchapter III of this chapter.

(c)

A court of the District need not apply this chapter if the child custody law of a foreign country violates fundamental principles of human rights.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 105 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).